Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 3. Registered Office and Agent; Principal Office.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 450, effective April 1, 2010, added “Principal Office” to the Article 3 heading.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, § 9.

§ 13.1-1015.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each domestic limited liability company and each foreign limited liability company registered pursuant to Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.) of this chapter shall continuously maintain in the Commonwealth:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent who shall be either:

An individual who is a resident of the Commonwealth and is (i) a member or manager of the limited liability company, (ii) a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, (iii) an officer or director of a corporation that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, (iv) a general partner of a general or limited partnership that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, (v) a trustee of a trust that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, or (vi) a member of the Virginia State Bar, and whose business office is identical with the registered office;

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; provided such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return; or

A Virginia resident who is an officer of the limited liability company, provided that such a registered agent or a natural person designated by the registered agent shall be available during regular business hours at the registered office to accept service of any process, notice, or demand. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return. As used in this subdivision, “officer of the limited liability company” means any employee of the limited liability company, other than a member or manager of the limited liability company, who has been designated by the limited liability company by instrument in writing as a person upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served.

The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company at its last known address any process, notice, or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1993, c. 113; 1994, c. 348; 1996, c. 265; 2000, cc. 162, 537; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2004, c. 314; 2005, c. 255; 2016, c. 275.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2 b, deleted “professional” proceeding “registered limited liability partnership registered,” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter.

The 2000 amendment by c. 537, in subdivision A 2 a, inserted clause (iv) and redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (v).

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and inserted “or manager” in subdivision A 2 a; in subdivision A 2 b, substituted “A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company” for “A professional corporation, professional limited liability company,” substituted “authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “registered with the Virginia State Bar under §

54.1-3902

” and inserted the language beginning “provided such a registered agent . . .”; and in subsection B, inserted “process” and “or demand.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 314, in subdivision A 2, redesignated clauses A 2 a (ii) through (v) as present clauses A 2 a (iii) through (vi) and inserted present clause A 2 a (ii); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 255 deleted “either” preceding “(i)” in subdivision A 2 a.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 275 added subdivision A 2 c and made related changes.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Service of process. —

Lenders had no obligation to try to find a limited liability company’s registered agent, and service on the Clerk of the State Corporation Commission was proper, because the registered agent did not designate a natural person in her office upon whom process could be served. Howell v. Boone, 99 Va. Cir. 261, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 119 (Norfolk June 15, 2018).

§ 13.1-1016.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may change its registered office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the post-office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is to be located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the domestic or foreign limited liability company will be in compliance with the requirements of §

13.1-1015

.

A statement of change shall forthwith be filed with the Commission by a domestic or foreign limited liability company whenever its registered agent dies, resigns or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-1015

.

A domestic or foreign limited liability company’s registered agent may sign a statement as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth or (ii) the name of the registered agent has been legally changed. A domestic or foreign limited liability company’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a statement as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record in the office of the clerk of the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to §

13.1-1015

. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a statement as required above, which shall recite that a copy of the statement shall be mailed to the principal office address of the domestic or foreign limited liability company on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2003, c. 597; 2009, c. 450; 2010, c. 434.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597 rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “If a registered agent changes his business address to another place within this Commonwealth, he shall change the address of the registered office of any limited liability company or foreign limited liability company of which he is a registered agent by filing a statement as required above except that it need be signed, either manually or in facsimile, only by the registered agent and must recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to the limited liability company.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 450, effective April 1, 2010, substituted “Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.)” for “Article 11 (§

13.1-1061

et seq.)” in the introductory language of subsection A and in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “to transact business in the Commonwealth” for “pursuant to Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.) of this chapter,” “filing with the Commission” for “filing in the office of the Commission,” and “prescribed and furnished” for “supplied”; substituted “domestic” for “limited liability company” in subdivision A 6; in subsection B, substituted “filed with” for “filed in the office of,” “domestic or foreign” for “limited liability company or a foreign” and deleted “registered pursuant to Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.) of this chapter” following “liability company”; and rewrote subsection C.

§ 13.1-1017.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the domestic or foreign limited liability company by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation stating (i) the name of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the domestic or foreign limited liability company. The statement of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the statement mailed to the principal office of the domestic or foreign limited liability company by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. When the statement of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (i) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission or (ii) the date on which a statement of change to appoint a registered agent is filed, in accordance with §

13.1-1016

, with the Commission.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2010, c. 434; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “The registered agent of a domestic or foreign limited liability company may resign the agency” for “A registered agent may resign his agency,” “by a certification that the registered agent shall mail a copy thereof to the principal office of the domestic” for “by his certification that he has mailed a copy thereof by certified mail,” “domestic” for “limited liability company,” inserted “by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed” and substituted “of resignation may include” for “may also include.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which read: “A. The registered agent of a domestic or foreign limited liability company may resign the agency appointment by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation accompanied by a certification that the registered agent shall mail a copy thereof to the principal office of the domestic or foreign limited liability company by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

“B. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1018.
Service on limited liability company.

A domestic or foreign limited liability company’s registered agent is the limited liability company’s agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited liability company. The registered agent may by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, designate a natural person or persons in the office of the registered agent upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served. Whenever any such person accepts service of process, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

Whenever a domestic or foreign limited liability company fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this Commonwealth, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the clerk of the Commission shall be an agent of the limited liability company upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a domestic or foreign limited liability company.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2001, cc. 517, 541.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and inserted “natural” preceding “person or persons” in subsection A.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Service on registered agent. —

Homeowners’ motion for default judgment was denied for improper service of process because although the complaint was addressed to the registered agent of a limited liability company, it was not served on the agent but was served on a project coordinator; service on a non-designated, non-member employee was not sufficient to give the LLC notice of the pendency of the action against it. Nichols v. Vico Constr. Corp., 98 Va. Cir. 204, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 28 (Chesapeake Mar. 1, 2018).

Lenders had no obligation to try to find a limited liability company’s registered agent, and service on the Clerk of the State Corporation Commission was proper, because the registered agent did not designate a natural person in her office upon whom process could be served. Howell v. Boone, 99 Va. Cir. 261, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 119 (Norfolk June 15, 2018).

§ 13.1-1018.1.
Change of principal office.

A limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered pursuant to Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.) may change its principal office upon filing in the office of the Commission a statement of change on a form supplied by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company;

The address of its current principal office; and

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new principal office.

A statement of change shall forthwith be delivered to the Commission for filing by a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered pursuant to Article 10 (§

13.1-1051

et seq.) whenever the address of its principal office ceases to be the office at which the principal executive offices of the domestic or foreign limited liability company are located.

History.

2009, c. 450; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 450, cl. 2 made this section effective April 1, 2010.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B; in subsection A, deleted “of this chapter” preceding “may change.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).